Oklahoma, session 2026, HB4253.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be
codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:
This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Taxpayer
Dollars Protect Workers Act".
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 46B-1 of Title 62, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. The Legislature finds that the State of Oklahoma:
HB4253 HFLR Page 1
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

1. As part of its economic development policy, has the right to
set terms and conditions in connection with the awarding of economic
development incentives;
2. As part of its economic development policy, seeks to play an
integral role in the formulation of economic opportunities,
conditions of grants, and general management of compliance with such
awards for monies;
3. Will often, as part of awarding economic development
incentives, oversee compliance with land use regulations, including
management of the subdivision of property; offer and provide water
and wastewater services; require fire protection systems and
mechanical systems for buildings and structures; approve capital
grants; and ensure such monies are approved by the applicable state
agency;
4. Will often, as part of awarding economic development
incentives, also require a private business to hire a certain number
of new full-time employees, require a specific amount of company
investment, and ensure workers obtain certain skills and knowledge;
and
5. As part of its economic development policy, has a vested
interest in seeking to advance and preserve its own interest in
projects receiving economic development incentives as a financer of
projects contributing to the State's overall economic health.
B. It is the intent of the Oklahoma Legislature that:
HB4253 HFLR Page 2
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

1. As part of its economic development policy, that whenever
State funds or benefits are sought by a private business that such
benefits are conditioned on the private business agreeing not to
waive its employees' right to a secret ballot election when
recognizing a labor organization as a bargaining unit or requiring
subcontractors to waive their employees' right to a secret ballot
election; and
2. Whenever State funds or benefits are provided or awarded to
a private business, the private business working on a project
receiving State funds or benefits, shall not voluntarily disclose
employee personal contact information to a labor organization
without an employee's prior consent, waive their right to speak to
their employees or require subcontractors to voluntarily disclose
employee personal contact information to a labor organization
without an employee's prior consent or waive the subcontractor's
right to speak to the subcontractor's employees.
SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 46B-2 of Title 62, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. As used in this section:
1. "Contracts" includes:
a. agreements between an employer and the state, and
b agreements between an employer and a labor
organization;
HB4253 HFLR Page 3
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

2. "Economic development incentive" means:
a. the investment tax credit authorized by Section 2357.4
of Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes,
b. the exemption from ad valorem tax authorized pursuant
to Section 2902 of Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes,
c. incentive payments from the Oklahoma Quality Jobs
Program,
d. incentive payments from the Small Employer Quality
Jobs Program,
e. incentive payments from the 21st Century Quality Jobs
Incentive Act,
f. any credit against state income tax or other state tax
authorized for use by a for profit business entity
pursuant to the Oklahoma Statutes based upon job
creation or capital investment or expenditures,
g. any other state incentive program, grant and economic
development grant authorized by law for economic
development purposes provided to an employer to
attract or retain the employer's physical presence in
this state;
3. "Employee" means an individual who performs services for an
employer for wages that are subject to withholding requirements
under Section 3402 of Title 26 of the United States Code;

HB4253 HFLR Page 4
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

4. "Employer" means a business entity that voluntarily pursues
economic development incentives authorized by law or enters into an
agreement with this state for the purpose of receiving those
incentives;
5. "Labor organization" has the same meaning as defined in
Section 152 of Title 29 of the United States Code;
6. "Personal contact information" means an employee's home
address, home or personal cell phone number, or personal email
address;
7. "Secret ballot election" means a process conducted by the
National Labor Relations Board (NLRB) in which an employee casts a
secret ballot for or against labor organization representation;
8. "Subcontractor" means an individual or entity that has
contracted with the employer to perform work or provide services;
and
9. "Neutrality agreement" means an agreement signed with a
union wherein the employer agrees to conditions including, but not
limited to committing not speak to employees about union issues.
B. 1. To be eligible for an economic development incentive, an
employer must not:
a. grant recognition rights for employees solely and
exclusively on the basis of signed union authorization
cards if the selection of a bargaining representative
may instead be conducted through a secret ballot
HB4253 HFLR Page 5
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

election conducted by the National Labor Relations
Board (NLRB),
b. voluntarily disclose an employee's personal contact
information to a labor organization, or third party
acting on behalf of a labor organization, without the
employee's prior written consent, unless otherwise
required by state or federal law,
c. sign a neutrality agreement with a labor organization,
d. require a subcontractor performing work for or
providing services to the employer to engage in
activities prohibited in this subsection B of this
section.
2. The prohibitions set out in subsection B of this section
apply to any work or service for the employer on the project for
which the economic incentive is provided.
C. A person or entity may report, based upon a reasonable
belief, a suspected violation of subsection B of this section to the
Attorney General; provided, that such report must be made during the
term of the separate agreement entered into by and between the
applicable state agency and the employer pursuant to law. Upon
receiving a report pursuant to this subsection, the Attorney General
shall determine whether a violation has occurred. It is a breach of
the separate agreement entered into between the applicable state
agency and the employer pursuant to law for the employer to refuse
HB4253 HFLR Page 6
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

to p rovide the written statement. If the applicable state agency
finds that an employer has violated subsection B of this section,
then the applicable state agency shall deliver written notice of the
agency's findings to the employer informing the employer and to the
Office of the Attorney General to initiate proceedings to recover
funds.
D. 1. This section applies prospectively and excludes:
a. an agreement between this state and an employer
executed prior to the effective date of this act,
b. an agreement between an employer and a labor
organization executed prior to the effective date of
this act, or
2. As used in subdivision subparagraph a of paragraph 1 of this
subsection, "agreement" includes a memorandum of understanding
mutually accepted by the applicable state agency and an employer
prior to the effective date of this act, including a legally binding
agreement subsequent and subject to the memorandum of understanding.
3. Notwithstanding paragraph 1 of subsection D of this section
shall apply to any agreement, contract, or memorandum of
understanding between an employer and a labor organization or the
state executed, renewed, or modified on or after the effective date
of this act.


HB4253 HFLR Page 7
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

SECTION 4. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 46B-3 of Title 62, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. Notwithstanding another law to the contrary, prior to
contracting to award an economic development incentive, as defined
in paragraph 2 of Section 2 of this act, the applicable state agency
must execute a separate agreement with the recipient of the
incentive that reserves the right of the applicable state agency to
recover the amount of money, grants, funds, or other incentives
disbursed by the state agency if the recipient benefitting from such
money, grants, funds, or other incentives fails to comply with the
requirements of this act.
B. The separate agreement required by subsection A of this
section must have a term of not less than:
1. The term the applicable state agency would require for an
agreement executed pursuant to applicable provisions of law, for an
economic development incentive of less than Five Million Dollars
($5,000,000.00); or
2. Twenty (20) years, for an economic development incentive of
Five Million Dollars ($5,000,000.00) or more.
SECTION 5. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON RULES, dated 03/04/2026 - DO PASS,
As Amended.

HB4253 HFLR Page 8
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.